North Carolina, session 2025, HB5.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REVISIONS TO CONCEALED CARRY LAWS
SECTION 1.1. G.S. 14-269 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-269. Carrying concealed weapons.
(a) It shall be Except as otherwise provided by law, it is unlawful for any person willfully
and intentionally to carry concealed about his or her person any bowie knife, dirk, dagger, slung
shot, loaded cane, metallic knuckles, razor, shuriken, stun gun, or other deadly weapon of like
kind, except when the person is on the person's own premises. For purposes of this section, the
term "weapon" does not include a firearm.
(a1) It shall be unlawful for any person willfully and intentionally to carry concealed about
his or her person any pistol or gun except in the following circumstances:
(1) The person is on the person's own premises.
(2) The deadly weapon is a handgun, the person has a concealed handgun permit
issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter or considered valid
under G.S. 14-415.24, and the person is carrying the concealed handgun in
accordance with the scope of the concealed handgun permit as set out in
G.S. 14-415.11(c).
(3) The deadly weapon is a handgun and the person is a military permittee as
defined under G.S. 14-415.10(2a) who provides to the law enforcement
officer proof of deployment as required under G.S. 14-415.11(a).
(a2) This prohibition does not apply to a person who has a concealed handgun permit
issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter, has a concealed handgun permit
considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24, or is exempt from obtaining a permit pursuant to
G.S. 14-415.25, provided the weapon is a handgun, is in a closed compartment or container
within the person's locked vehicle, and the vehicle is in a parking area that is owned or leased by
State government. A person may unlock the vehicle to enter or exit the vehicle, provided the
*H5-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
handgun remains in the closed compartment at all times and the vehicle is locked immediately
following the entrance or exit.
(a3) Some of the exceptions listed in subsection (b) of this section include a condition that
the person have a concealed handgun permit. In those circumstances, a person must still have a
concealed handgun permit issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter or considered
valid under G.S. 14-415.24 to qualify as an exception.
…
(b1) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that:if all of the following apply:
(1) The weapon was not a firearm;
(2) The defendant was engaged in, or on the way to or from, an activity in which
the defendant legitimately used the weapon;weapon.
(3) The defendant possessed the weapon for that legitimate use; anduse.
(4) The defendant did not use or attempt to use the weapon for an illegal purpose.
The burden of proving this defense is on the defendant.
(b2) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that:
(1) The deadly weapon is a handgun;
(2) The defendant is a military permittee as defined under G.S. 14-415.10(2a);
and
(3) The defendant provides to the court proof of deployment as defined under
G.S. 14-415.10(3a).
(c) Any Except as otherwise provided by law, any person violating the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. Any person violating the
provisions of subsection (a1) of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor for the first
offense and a Class H felony for a second or subsequent offense. A violation of subsection (a1)
of this section punishable under G.S. 14-415.21(a) is not punishable under this section.
…."
SECTION 1.2. Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 54C.
"Carrying Concealed Handguns.
"§ 14-415.35. Carrying concealed handguns.
(a) Carrying Concealed Handgun. – Any person who is a citizen of the United States and
is at least 18 years old may carry a concealed handgun in this State unless provided otherwise by
law.
(b) Offense. – It is unlawful for a person who meets any of the following criteria to carry
a concealed handgun:
(1) Is ineligible to own, possess, or receive a firearm under the provisions of State
or federal law.
(2) Is under indictment for a felony.
(3) Has been adjudicated guilty in any court of a felony, unless (i) the felony is
an offense that pertains to antitrust violations, unfair trade practices, restraints
of trade, or other similar offenses related to the regulation of business practices
or (ii) the person's firearms rights have been restored pursuant to
G.S. 14-415.4 or have been restored in another state pursuant to the laws of
that state.
(4) Is a fugitive from justice.
(5) Is an unlawful user of, or addicted to, marijuana, alcohol, or any depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, or any other controlled substance as defined in 21
U.S.C. § 802.
Page 2 House Bill 5-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Is currently or has been previously adjudicated by a court to be lacking mental
capacity or mentally ill. Receipt of previous consultative services or outpatient
treatment alone shall not disqualify any citizen under this subdivision.
(7) Is or has been discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States under
conditions other than honorable.
(8) Except as provided in subdivision (9), (10), or (11) of this subsection, is or
has been adjudicated guilty of or received a prayer for judgment continued or
suspended sentence for one or more crimes of violence constituting a
misdemeanor, including, but not limited to, a violation of a misdemeanor
under Article 8 of this Chapter except for a violation of G.S. 14-33(a), or a
violation of a misdemeanor under G.S. 14-226.1, 14-258.1, 14-269.2,
14-269.6, 14-277, 14-277.1, 14-283 except for a violation involving fireworks
exempted under G.S. 14-288.2, 14-288.4(a)(1), 14-288.6, 14-288.9, former
14-288.12, former 14-288.13, former 14-288.14, 14-414, 14-415.21(b),
14-415.26(d) within three years prior to the date on which the application is
submitted, or 14-415.36.
(9) Is or has been adjudicated guilty of or received a prayer for judgment
continued or suspended sentence for one or more crimes of violence
constituting a misdemeanor under G.S. 14-33(c)(1), 14-33(c)(2), 14-33(c)(3),
14-33(d), 14-134.3, 14-277.3A, 14-318.2, 50B-4.1, or former 14-277.3.
(10) Is prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 922(g) as a
result of a conviction of a misdemeanor crime of domestic violence.
(11) Has been adjudicated guilty of or received a prayer for judgment continued or
suspended sentence for one or more crimes involving an assault or a threat to
assault a law enforcement officer, probation or parole officer, person
employed at a State or local detention facility, firefighter, emergency medical
technician, medical responder, or emergency department personnel.
(12) Has had entry of a prayer for judgment continued for a criminal offense that
would make it unlawful under this section for the person to carry a concealed
weapon.
(13) Is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing
for a crime that would make it unlawful under this section for the person to
carry a concealed weapon.
(14) Has been convicted of an impaired driving offense under G.S. 20-138.1,
20-138.2, or 20-138.3 within three years prior to the date on which the person
is carrying the weapon.
(c) Valid Identification Required; Disclosure to Law Enforcement Officer When
Carrying Concealed. – When carrying a concealed handgun, a person shall also carry valid
identification and shall disclose to any law enforcement officer that the person is carrying a
concealed handgun when approached or addressed by the officer and shall display the proper
identification upon the request of a law enforcement officer.
(d) Penalty. – Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a Class
3 misdemeanor. Any person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a Class 2
misdemeanor for a first offense and is guilty of a Class H felony for a second or subsequent
offense. Any person who violates subsection (c) of this section commits an infraction and shall
be punished in accordance with G.S. 14-3.1.
"§ 14-415.36. Unlawful to carry a concealed weapon into certain areas.
(a) It is unlawful to carry a concealed weapon into the following areas unless provided
otherwise by law:
(1) In an area prohibited by rule adopted under G.S. 120-32.1.
(2) In any area prohibited by 18 U.S.C. § 922 or any other federal law.
House Bill 5-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) In a law enforcement or correctional facility.
(4) On any private premises where notice that carrying a concealed handgun is
prohibited by the posting of a conspicuous notice or statement by the person
in legal possession or control of the premises.
(b) A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor."
SECTION 1.3. G.S. 14-269.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-269.3. Carrying weapons into assemblies and establishments where alcoholic
beverages are sold and consumed.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person consuming alcohol, or at any time while the person
has remaining in the person's body any alcohol or in the person's blood a controlled substance
previously consumed, to carry any gun, rifle, or pistol into any assembly where a fee has been
charged for admission thereto, or into any establishment in which alcoholic beverages are sold
and consumed. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1
misdemeanor.
(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) A person exempted from the provisions of G.S. 14-269.
(2) The owner or lessee of the premises or business establishment.
(3) A person participating in the event, if the person is carrying a gun, rifle, or
pistol with the permission of the owner, lessee, or person or organization
sponsoring the event.
(4) A person registered or hired as a security guard by the owner, lessee, or person
or organization sponsoring the event.
(5) A person carrying a handgun if the person has a valid concealed handgun
permit issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter, has a concealed
handgun permit considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24, or is exempt from
obtaining a permit pursuant to G.S. 14-415.25. This subdivision shall not be
construed to permit a person to carry a handgun on any premises where the
person in legal possession or control of the premises has posted a conspicuous
notice prohibiting the carrying of a concealed handgun on the premises in
accordance with G.S. 14-415.11(c)."
SECTION 1.4. G.S. 14-269.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-269.4. Weapons on certain State property and in courthouses.
It shall be unlawful for any person to possess, or carry, whether openly or concealed, any
deadly weapon, not used solely for instructional or officially sanctioned ceremonial purposes in
the State Capitol Building, the Executive Mansion, the Western Residence of the Governor, or
on the grounds of any of these buildings, and in any building housing any court of the General
Court of Justice. If a court is housed in a building containing nonpublic uses in addition to the
court, then this prohibition shall apply only to that portion of the building used for court purposes
while the building is being used for court purposes.
This section shall not apply to any of the following:
…
(6) A person with a permit issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter,
with a permit considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24, or who is exempt from
obtaining a permit pursuant to G.S. 14-415.25, A person carrying a concealed
handgun who has a firearm in a closed compartment or container within the
person's locked vehicle or in a locked container securely affixed to the person's
vehicle. A person may unlock the vehicle to enter or exit the vehicle provided
the firearm remains in the closed compartment at all times and the vehicle is
locked immediately following the entrance or exit.
Page 4 House Bill 5-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) Any person who carries or possesses an ordinary pocket knife, as defined in
G.S. 14-269(d), carried in a closed position into the State Capitol Building or
on the grounds of the State Capitol Building.
Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor."
SECTION 1.5. G.S. 14-277.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-277.2. Weapons at parades, etc., prohibited.
…
(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to concealed carry of a handgun at a
parade or funeral procession by a person with a valid permit issued in accordance with Article
54B of this Chapter, with a permit considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24, or who is exempt from
obtaining a permit pursuant to G.S. 14-415.25. procession. This subsection shall not be construed
to permit a person to carry a concealed handgun on any premises where the person in legal
possession or control of the premises has posted a conspicuous notice prohibiting the carrying of
a concealed handgun on the premises in accordance with G.S. 14-415.11(c)."
SECTION 1.6. G.S. 14-269.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-269.1. Confiscation and disposition of deadly weapons.
Upon conviction of any person for violation of G.S. 14-269, G.S. 14-269.7, 14-269.7,
14-415.35(b), or any other offense involving the use of a deadly weapon of a type referred to in
G.S. 14-269, weapon, including a firearm, the deadly weapon with reference to which the
defendant shall have been convicted shall be ordered confiscated and disposed of by the presiding
judge at the trial in one of the following ways in the discretion of the presiding judge.
…."
SECTION 1.7. G.S. 14-269.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-269.2. Weapons on campus or other educational property.
…
(i) The provisions of this section shall not apply to an employee of an institution of higher
education as defined in G.S. 116-143.1 or a nonpublic post-secondary educational institution who
resides on the campus of the institution at which the person is employed when all of the following
criteria are met:
(1) The employee's residence is a detached, single-family dwelling in which only
the employee and the employee's immediate family reside.
(2) The institution is either:
a. An institution of higher education as defined by G.S. 116-143.1.
b. A nonpublic post-secondary educational institution that has not
specifically prohibited the possession of a handgun pursuant to this
subsection.
(3) The weapon is a handgun.
(4) The handgun is possessed in one of the following manners as appropriate:
a. If the employee has a concealed handgun permit that is valid under
Article 54B of this Chapter, or who is exempt from obtaining a permit
pursuant to that Article, the handgun may be The handgun is on the
premises of the employee's residence or in a closed compartment or
container within the employee's locked vehicle that is located in a
parking area of the educational property of the institution at which the
person is employed and resides. Except for direct transfer between the
residence and the vehicle, the handgun must remain at all times either
on the premises of the employee's residence or in the closed
compartment of the employee's locked vehicle. The employee may
unlock the vehicle to enter or exit, but must lock the vehicle
immediately following the entrance or exit if the handgun is in the
vehicle.
House Bill 5-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. If the employee is not authorized to carry a concealed handgun
pursuant to Article 54B of this Chapter, the handgun may be on the
premises of the employee's residence, and may only be in the
employee's vehicle when the vehicle is occupied by the employee and
the employee is immediately leaving the campus or is driving directly
to their residence from off campus. The employee may possess the
handgun on the employee's person outside the premises of the
employee's residence when making a direct transfer of the handgun
from the residence to the employee's vehicle when the employee is
immediately leaving the campus or from the employee's vehicle to the
residence when the employee is arriving at the residence from off
campus.
(j) The provisions of this section shall not apply to an employee of a public or nonpublic
school who resides on the campus of the school at which the person is employed when all of the
following criteria are met:
(1) The employee's residence is a detached, single-family dwelling in which only
the employee and the employee's immediate family reside.
(2) The school is either:
a. A public school which provides residential housing for enrolled
students.
b. A nonpublic school which provides residential housing for enrolled
students and has not specifically prohibited the possession of a
handgun pursuant to this subsection.
(3) The weapon is a handgun.
(4) The handgun is possessed in one of the following manners as appropriate:
a. If the employee has a concealed handgun permit that is valid under
Article 54B of this Chapter, or who is exempt from obtaining a permit
pursuant to that Article, the handgun may be The handgun is on the
premises of the employee's residence or in a closed compartment or
container within the employee's locked vehicle that is located in a
parking area of the educational property of the school at which the
person is employed and resides. Except for direct transfer between the
residence and the vehicle, the handgun must remain at all times either
on the premises of the employee's residence or in the closed
compartment of the employee's locked vehicle. The employee may
unlock the vehicle to enter or exit, but must lock the vehicle
immediately following the entrance or exit if the handgun is in the
vehicle.
b. If the employee is not authorized to carry a concealed handgun
pursuant to Article 54B of this Chapter, the handgun may be on the
premises of the employee's residence, and may only be in the
employee's vehicle when the vehicle is occupied by the employee and
the employee is immediately leaving the campus or is driving directly
to their residence from off campus. The employee may possess the
handgun on the employee's person outside the premises of the
employee's residence when making a direct transfer of the handgun
from the residence to the employee's vehicle when the employee is
immediately leaving the campus or from the employee's vehicle to the
residence when the employee is arriving at the residence from off
campus.
Page 6 House Bill 5-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(k) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a person who has a concealed handgun
permit that is valid under Article 54B of this Chapter, or who is exempt from obtaining a permit
pursuant to that Article, if when any of the following conditions are met:
(1) The person has a handgun in a closed compartment or container within the
person's locked vehicle or in a locked container securely affixed to the person's
vehicle and only unlocks the vehicle to enter or exit the vehicle while the
firearm remains in the closed compartment at all times and immediately locks
the vehicle following the entrance or exit.
(2) The person has a handgun concealed on the person and the person remains in
the locked vehicle and only unlocks the vehicle to allow the entrance or exit
of another person.
(3) The person is within a locked vehicle and removes the handgun from
concealment only for the amount of time reasonably necessary to do either of
the following:
a. Move the handgun from concealment on the person to a closed
compartment or container within the vehicle.
b. Move the handgun from within a closed compartment or container
within the vehicle to concealment on the person.
(k1) For the purposes of this subsection, property owned by a local board of education or
county commission shall not be construed as a building that is a place of religious worship as
defined in G.S. 14-54.1. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a person who has a
concealed handgun permit that is valid under Article 54B of this Chapter, or who is exempt from
obtaining a permit pursuant to that Article, if all of the following conditions apply:
(1) The person possesses and carries a handgun on educational property other than
an institution of higher education as defined by G.S. 116-143.1 or a nonpublic,
postsecondary educational institution.
(2) The educational property is the location of both a school and a building that is
a place of religious worship as defined in G.S. 14-54.1.
(3) The weapon is a handgun.
(4) The handgun is only possessed and carried on educational property outside of
the school operating hours.
(5) The person or persons in legal possession or control of the premises have not
posted a conspicuous notice prohibiting the carrying of a concealed handgun
on the premises in accordance with G.S. 14-415.11(c).
…."
SECTION 1.8. G.S. 14-401.24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-401.24. Unlawful possession and use of unmanned aircraft systems.
…
(c) The following definitions apply to this section:
…
(5) Weapon. – Those weapons specified in G.S. 14-269, 14-269.2, 14-284.1, or
14-288.8 and any other object object, including a firearm, capable of inflicting
serious bodily injury or death when used as a weapon.
…."
SECTION 1.9. G.S. 14-409.40 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-409.40. Statewide uniformity of local regulation.
…
(f) Nothing contained in this section prohibits municipalities or counties from application
of their authority under G.S. 153A-129, 160A-189, 14-269, 14-269.2, 14-269.3, 14-269.4,
14-277.2, 14-415.11, 14-415.23, 14-415.35, including prohibiting the possession of firearms in
public-owned buildings, on the grounds or parking areas of those buildings, or in public parks or
House Bill 5-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
recreation areas, except nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a person from storing a firearm
within a motor vehicle while the vehicle is on these grounds or areas. Nothing contained in this
section prohibits municipalities or counties from exercising powers provided by law in states of
emergency declared under Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes.
…."
SECTION 1.10. G.S. 14-415.4(e)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) The petitioner is under indictment for a felony or a finding of probable cause
exists against the petitioner for a felony."
SECTION 1.11. Article 54B of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-415.10A. Purpose.
While G.S. 14-415.35 makes it lawful to carry a concealed weapon in this State without
obtaining a concealed handgun permit, it is often convenient to have a concealed handgun permit
for the purpose of reciprocity when traveling in another state, to make the purchase of a firearm
more efficient, or for various other reasons. Therefore, the State of North Carolina shall continue
to make a concealed handgun permit available to any person who applies for and is eligible to
receive a concealed handgun permit pursuant to this Article."
SECTION 1.12. G.S. 14-415.11(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Any person who has a concealed handgun permit may carry a concealed handgun
unless otherwise specifically prohibited by law. The person shall carry the permit together with
valid identification whenever the person is carrying a concealed handgun, shall disclose to any
law enforcement officer that the person holds a valid permit and is carrying a concealed handgun
when approached or addressed by the officer, and shall display both the permit and the proper
identification upon the request of a law enforcement officer. In addition to these requirements, a
military permittee whose permit has expired during deployment may carry a concealed handgun
during the 90 days following the end of deployment and before the permit is renewed provided
the permittee also displays proof of deployment to any law enforcement officer."
SECTION 1.13. G.S. 14-415.22 is repealed.
SECTION 1.14. G.S. 74E-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74E-6. Oaths, powers, and authority of company police officers.
…
(c) All Company Police. – Company police officers, while in the performance of their
duties of employment, have the same powers as municipal and county police officers to make
arrests for both felonies and misdemeanors and to charge for infractions on any of the following:
(1) Real property owned by or in the possession and control of their employer.
(2) Real property owned by or in the possession and control of a person who has
contracted with the employer to provide on-site company police security
personnel services for the property.
(3) Any other real property while in continuous and immediate pursuit of a person
for an offense committed upon property described in subdivisions (1) or (2)
of this subsection.
Company police officers shall have, if duly authorized by the superior officer in charge, the
authority to carry concealed weapons pursuant to and in conformity with G.S. 14-269(b)(4) and
(5).G.S. 14-269(b)(4) and (b)(5) and G.S. 14-415.35.
…."
SECTION 1.15. G.S. 74G-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74G-6. Oaths, powers, and authority of campus police officers.
…
(d) Concealed Weapons. – Campus police officers shall have, if duly authorized by their
campus police agency and by the sheriff of the county in which the campus police agency is
Page 8 House Bill 5-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
located, the authority to carry concealed weapons pursuant to and in conformity with
G.S. 14-269(b)(5).G.S. 14-269(b)(5) and G.S. 14-415.35.
…."
SECTION 1.16. G.S. 113-136 reads as rewritten:
"§ 113-136. Enforcement authority of inspectors and protectors; refusal to obey or allow
inspection by inspectors and protectors.
…
(d) Inspectors and protectors are additionally authorized to arrest without warrant under
the terms of G.S. 15A-401(b) for felonies, for breaches of the peace, for assaults upon them or in
their presence, and for other offenses evincing a flouting of their authority as enforcement
officers or constituting a threat to public peace and order which would tend to subvert the
authority of the State if ignored. In particular, they are authorized, subject to the direction of the
administrative superiors, to arrest for violations of G.S. 14-223, 14-225, 14-269, and
14-277.14-277, and 14-415.35.
…."
SECTION 1.17. This Part becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

PART II. AUTHORIZE ELECTED STATE OFFICIALS TO CARRY A CONCEALED
FIREARM WHILE PERFORMING OFFICIAL DUTIES
SECTION 2.1. G.S. 14-269(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(10) Any person who is an elected official or person appointed to fill an elective
office in this State, when acting in discharge of their official duties, and who
has a concealed handgun permit issued in accordance with Article 54B of this
Chapter or considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24; provided that the person
shall not carry a concealed weapon at any time while consuming alcohol or an
unlawful controlled substance or while alcohol or an unlawful controlled
substance remains in the person's body. This subdivision does not exempt the
person from the provisions of G.S. 14-269.2."
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 14-269.2(g)(1a) reads as rewritten:
"(1a) A person exempted by the provisions of subdivisions (1) through (9) of
G.S. 14-269(b)."
SECTION 2.3. G.S. 14-415.27 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.27. Expanded permit scope for certain persons.
(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 14-415.11(c), any of the following persons who has a
concealed handgun permit issued pursuant to this Article or that is considered valid under
G.S. 14-415.24 is not subject to the area prohibitions set out in G.S. 14-415.11(c) and may carry
a concealed handgun in the areas listed in G.S. 14-415.11(c) unless otherwise prohibited by
federal law:
…
(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 14-415.11(c), any elected official or person appointed to fill an
elective office in this State, when acting in discharge of their official duties, and who has a
concealed handgun permit issued pursuant to this Article or that is considered valid under
G.S. 14-415.21 is not subject to the area prohibitions set out in subdivisions (1a) through (8) of
G.S. 14-415.11(c) and may carry a concealed handgun in the areas listed in subdivisions (1a)
through (8) of G.S. 14-415.11(c) unless otherwise prohibited by federal law."
SECTION 2.4. This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.

PART III. SAVINGS CLAUSE AND EFFECTIVE DATE
House Bill 5-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.1. Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this
act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act
remain applicable to those prosecutions.
SECTION 3.2. Except as otherwise provided in this act, this act is effective when it
becomes law.
Page 10 House Bill 5-First Edition